Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) Within existing resources, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall complete a systemic performance audit of fraud in the state's financial aid programs. The purpose of the audit is to determine the extent to which financial aid fraud is occurring at institutions of higher education that receive and distribute financial aid to students. To the extent possible, the study must determine:(a) The number of fictitious students enrolled, denied enrollment, and disenrolled at institutions that receive financial aid;(b) Any trends in fraudulent enrollments, such as preferred course types or targeted colleges;(c) The amount of federal, state, and local financial aid and other forms of assistance that have been provided to fictitious students. To the extent possible, the study must determine the amount recovered;(d) Identify systemic weaknesses that may be exploited to enroll fictitious students, including the use of artificial intelligence for such purposes;(e) Any unintended consequences to full-time equivalent calculations and funding to institutions; and(f) Other issues that may be relevant and significant to the audit.(2) The auditor shall report findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2027. The report must include, but is not limited to, the following elements as they relate to the audit:(a) Analysis of gaps in fraud prevention;(b) Evaluation of the use of any funding used for cybersecurity, including efforts to combat enrollment and financial aid fraud;(c) Evaluation of any current actions used by participating institutions to combat financial aid fraud; and(d) Recommendations for statutory and regulatory changes that may be necessary to protect student financial aid from fraud. (3) This section expires July 1, 2028.--- END ---